District of Columbia statutes.
2-580

Training.

The Office of Boards and Commissions, established December 19, 2001 (Mayor’s Order 2001-189), in coordination with the Open Government Office, shall:

(1)

Develop a training manual for members of public bodies; and

(2)

Annually advise all members of public bodies of their responsibilities under this subchapter.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 410
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734